Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.120

Growth management.

(1) The department shall serve as the central coordinator for state government in the implementation of the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW. The department shall work closely with all Washington communities planning for future growth and responding to the pressures of urban sprawl. The department shall ensure coordinated implementation of the growth management act by state agencies.

(2) The department shall offer technical and financial assistance to cities and counties planning under the growth management act. The department shall help local officials interpret and implement the different requirements of the act through workshops, model ordinances, and information materials.

(3) The department shall provide alternative dispute resolution to jurisdictions and organizations to mediate disputes and to facilitate consistent implementation of the growth management act. The department shall review local governments compliance with the requirements of the growth management act and make recommendations to the governor.

[ 1993 c 280 s 15.]